en: Hair dyes
ar: صبغات الشعر
az: Saç boyaları
bg: Бои за коса
cs: Barvy na vlasy
da: Hårfarver
de: Haarfärbemittel
el: Βαφές μαλλιών
es: Tintes para el cabello
et: Juuksevärvid
fa: رنگ مو
fi: Hiusten värit
fr: Colorations capillaires, colorations
ga: Ruaimeanna gruaige
hr: Boje za kosu
hu: Hajfestékek
hy: Մազերի ներկեր
id: Pewarna rambut
is: Hár litarefni
it: Tinture per capelli
ja: 染毛剤
ka: თმის საღებავები
kk: Шаш бояғыштары
ko: 염색약
ky: Чач боёктору
lt: Plaukų dažai
lv: Matu krāsas
mk: Бои за коса
ms: Pewarna rambut
mt: Żebgħa tax-xagħar
nl: Haarverf
no: Hårfarger
pl: Farby do włosów
pt: Tintas de cabelo
ro: Vopsele de păr
ru: Краски для волос
sk: Farby na vlasy
sl: Barve za lase
sq: Ngjyra e flokëve
sr: Боје за косу
sv: Hårfärgningsmedel
sw: Rangi za nywele
tg: Рангҳои мӯй
th: สีย้อมผม
tk: Saç reňkleri
tr: Saç boyaları
uk: Фарби для волосся
uz: Soch bo'yoqlari
vi: Thuốc nhuộm tóc
zh: 染发剂

en: Hair straightening
ar: فرد الشعر
az: Saç düzləşdirmə
bg: Изправяне на косата
bn: চুল সোজা করা
ca: Allisat de cabells
cs: Narovnávání vlasů
da: Glatning af hår
de: Haarglättung
el: Ίσιωμα μαλλιών
es: Alisado del cabello
et: Juuste sirgendamine
fa: صاف کردن مو
fi: Hius suoristus
fr: Défrisage
ga: Gruaig a dhíriú
he: החלקת שיער
hr: Ravnanje kose
hu: Hajkiegyenesítés
hy: Մազերի ուղղում
id: Pelurusan rambut
is: Sléttun hárs
it: Stiratura dei capelli
ja: 縮毛矯正
ka: თმის გასწორება
kk: Шашты түзеу
km: ការកែសក់
ko: 머리 스트레이트
ky: Чачты түздөө
lt: Plaukų tiesinimas
lv: Matu taisnošana
mk: Исправање на косата
ms: Meluruskan rambut
mt: Iddrittar tax-xagħar
nl: Haar stijlen
no: Hår retting
pl: Prostowanie włosów
pt: Alisamento capilar
ro: Îndreptarea părului
ru: Выпрямление волос
sk: Vyrovnávanie vlasov
sl: Ravnanje las
sq: Drejtimi i flokëve
sr: Исправљање косе
sv: Rakt hår
sw: Kunyoosha nywele
tg: Рост кардани мӯй
th: การยืดผม
tk: Saçyň düzedilmegi
tr: Saç düzleştirme
uk: Випрямлення волосся
ur: بالوں کو سیدھا کرنا
uz: Sochni tekislash
vi: Duỗi tóc
zh: 拉直头发

en: Hair styling products, Styling products
de: Haarstyling-Produkte, Styling-Produkte
es: Productos de peinado
fr: Coiffants
it: Prodotti per lo styling
nl: Haarstylingsproducten, Stylingproducten
pt: Produtos capilares, Produtos de styling

en: Hair Gel
ar: جل للشعر
az: Saç geli
bg: Гел за коса
cs: Gel na vlasy
da: Hårgel
de: Haargel
el: Τζελ μαλλιών
es: Gel para el cabello
et: Juuksegeel
fa: ژل مو
fi: Hiusten geeli
fr: Gels pour les cheveux, Gel pour les cheveux
ga: Glóthach gruaige
hr: Gel za kosu
hu: Hajzselé
hy: Մազի գել
id: Gel rambut
is: Hárgel
it: Gel per capelli
ja: ヘアジェル
ka: თმის გელი
kk: Шашқа арналған гель
ko: 헤어 젤
ky: Чач гели
lt: Plaukų gelis
lv: Matu želeja
mk: Гел за коса
ms: Gel rambut
mt: Ġel tax-xagħar
nl: Haargel
no: Hårgele
pl: Żel do włosów
pt: Gel para cabelo
ro: Gel de păr
ru: Гель для волос
sk: Gél na vlasy
sl: Gel za lase
sq: Xhel për flokë
sr: Гел за косу
sv: Hårgel
sw: Gel ya nywele
tg: Гели мӯй
th: เจลใส่ผม
tk: Saç üçin gel
tr: Saç jölesi
uk: Гель для волосся
uz: Soch geli
vi: Gel vuốt tóc

en: Hair sprays, Hairsprays
ar: مثبتات الشعر
az: Saç lakları
bg: Лакове за коса
cs: Laky na vlasy
da: Hårsprays
de: Haarsprays
el: Λακ μαλλιών
es: Laca para el cabello
et: Juukselakid
fa: اسپری مو
fi: Hiuslakat
fr: Laques pour les cheveux, Laque pour les cheveux, laque à cheveux
ga: Spraeanna gruaige
hr: Lakovi za kosu
hu: Hajlakkok
hy: Մազի լաքեր
id: Semprotan rambut
is: Hársprey
it: Lacche per capelli
ja: ヘアスプレー
ka: თმის ლაქები
kk: Шашқа арналған лактар
ko: 헤어 스프레이
ky: Чач лактары
lt: Plaukų lakas
lv: Matu lakas
mk: Лак за коса
ms: Semburan rambut
mt: Sprejs tax-xagħar
nl: Haarlak
no: Hårspray
pl: Lakiery do włosów
pt: Sprays de cabelo
ro: Fixativ de păr
ru: Лаки для волос
sk: Laky na vlasy
sl: Laki za lase
sq: Sprej për flokë
sr: Лак за косу
sv: Hårspray
sw: Dawa ya kunyunyizia nywele
tg: Лаки мӯй
th: สเปรย์ฉีดผม
tk: Saç spreyleri
tr: Saç spreyleri
uk: Лаки для волосся
uz: Soch spreyi
vi: Keo xịt tóc
zh: 发胶

en: Makeup
ar: مكياج
az: Makiyaj
bg: Грим
cs: Make-up
da: Makeup
de: Make-up
el: Μακιγιάζ
es: Maquillaje
et: Meik
fa: آرایش
fi: Meikki
fr: Maquillage
ga: Smideadh
hr: Šminka
hu: Smink
hy: Դիմահարդարում
id: Rias wajah
is: Förðun
it: Trucco
ja: メイクアップ
ka: მაკიაჟი
kk: Макияж
ko: 화장
ky: Макияж
lt: Makiažas
lv: Grims
mk: Шминка
ms: Solekan
mt: Mejkapp
nl: Make-up
no: Sminke
pl: Makijaż
pt: Maquiagem
ro: Machiaj
ru: Макияж
sk: Make-up
sl: Ličila
sq: Grim
sr: Шминка
sv: Smink
sw: Vipodozi
tg: Ороиш
th: แต่งหน้า
tk: Makyaj
tr: Makyaj
uk: Макіяж
uz: Makiyaj
vi: Trang điểm
zh: 化妆品

en: Eyes
da: Øjne
es: Ojos
fr: Yeux
it: Occhi
nl: Ogen
pt: Olhos
sv: Ögon

en: Eyes makeup
ar: مكياج العيون
az: Göz makiyajı
bg: Грим за очи
cs: Líčení očí
da: Øjenmakeup
de: Augen-Make-up
el: Μακιγιάζ ματιών
es: Maquillaje de ojos
et: Silmameik
fa: آرایش چشم
fi: Silmämeikki
fr: Maquillage pour les yeux
ga: Smideadh súl
hr: Šminka za oči
hu: Szemsmink
hy: Աչքերի դիմահարդարում
id: Rias mata
is: Augnförðun
it: Make up per occhio, Trucco occhi
ja: アイメイク
ka: თვალის მაკიაჟი
kk: Көз макияжы
ko: 아이 메이크업
ky: Көз макияжы
lt: Akių makiažas
lv: Acu grims
mk: Шминка за очи
ms: Solek mata
mt: Mejkapp tal-għajnejn
nl: Oogmake-up, Oog make-up
no: Øyesminke
pl: Makijaż oczu
pt: Maquilhagem para olhos
ro: Machiaj pentru ochi
ru: Макияж для глаз, косметика для глаз
sk: Líčenie očí
sl: Ličenje oči
sq: Grim për sy
sr: Шминка за очи
sv: Ögonmakeup
sw: Vipodozi vya macho
tg: Ороиши чашм
th: แต่งหน้าดวงตา
tk: Göz makýažy
tr: Göz makyajı
uk: Макіяж для очей
uz: Ko'z makiyaji
vi: Trang điểm mắt
zh: 眼妆

en: Mascara
de: Wimperntusche, Mascara
es: Rímel, Máscara de pestañas
fr: Mascara
it: Mascara
nl: Mascara
pt: Rímel, Máscara para cílios

en: Eyeliners
de: Eyeliner, Kajal
es: Delineadores de ojos, Delineador de ojos
fr: Eye-liners, Eye-liner, Ligneur, Ligneurs
it: Eyeliner
nl: Eyeliner, Eyeliners
pt: Delineadores, Delineador de olhos

en: Eyeshadows, Eyes shadows
ar: ظلال العيون
az: Göz kölgələri
bg: Сенки за очи
bn: চোখের ছায়া
ca: Ombres d'ulls
cs: Oční stíny
da: Øjenskygger
de: Lidschatten
el: Σκιές ματιών
es: Sombras de ojos
et: Lauvärvid
fa: سایه چشم
fi: Luomivärit
fr: Fards à paupières
ga: Scáth súl
he: צלליות
hr: Sjenila za oči
hu: Szemhéjpúderek
hy: Ստվերաներկեր
id: Perona mata
is: Augnskuggar
it: Ombretti
ja: アイシャドウ
ka: თვალის ჩრდილები
kk: Көз бояуы
km: ស្រមោលភ្នែក
ko: 아이섀도
ky: Көз боёгу
lt: Akių šešėliai
lv: Acu ēnas
mk: Сенки за очи
ms: Pembayang mata
mt: Dellijiet tal-għajnejn
nl: Oogschaduw
no: Øyenskygger
pl: Cienie do powiek
pt: Sombras de olhos
ro: Farduri de pleoape
ru: Тени для век
sk: Očné tiene
sl: Senčila za oči
sq: Hije sysh
sr: Сенке за очи
sv: Ögonskuggor
sw: Vivuli vya macho
tg: Сояҳои чашм
th: อายแชโดว์
tk: Göz kölegeleri
tr: Göz farları
uk: Тіні для повік
ur: آئی شیڈو
uz: Ko'z soyalari
vi: Phấn mắt
zh: 眼影

en: Eye pencils
ar: أقلام العيون
az: Göz qələmləri
bg: Моливи за очи
cs: Tužky na oči
da: Øjenblyanter
de: Augenstifte
el: Μολύβια ματιών
es: Lápices de ojos
et: Silmapliiatsid
fa: مداد چشم
fi: Silmäkynät
fr: Crayons yeux, Crayon yeux
ga: Peann luaidhe súl
hr: Olovke za oči
hu: Szemceruzák
hy: Աչքի մատիտներ
id: Pensil mata
is: Augnblýantar
it: Matite per occhi
ja: アイペンシル
ka: თვალის ფანქრები
kk: Көз қарындаштары
ko: 아이 펜슬
ky: Көз карандаштары
lt: Akių pieštukai
lv: Acu zīmuļi
mk: Моливи за очи
ms: Pensel mata
mt: Lapsijiet tal-għajnejn
nl: Oogpotloden, oogpotlood
no: Øyeblyanter
pl: Ołówki do oczu
pt: Lápis de olhos
ro: Creioane de ochi
ru: Карандаши для глаз
sk: Ceruzky na oči
sl: Svinčniki za oči
sq: Lapsa për sy
sr: Оловке за очи
sv: Ögonpennor
sw: Penseli za macho
tg: Қаламҳои чашм
tk: Göz galamlary
tr: Göz kalemleri
uk: Олівці для очей
uz: Ko'z qalamlari
vi: Bút chì kẻ mắt
zh: 眼线笔

en: Kohl pencils
ar: أقلام كحل
az: Sürmə qələmləri
bg: Моливи за очи с кохл
bn: কাজল পেন্সিল
ca: Llapis de kohl
cs: Kajalové tužky
da: Kohl blyanter
de: Kajalstifte
el: Μολύβια καγιάλ
es: Lápices de kohl
et: Kohl pliiatsid
fa: مداد سرمه
fi: Kajal-kynät
fr: Crayons khôl, Crayon khôl
ga: Peann luaidhe Kohl
he: עפרונות כחל
hr: Olovke za oči s kohlom
hu: Kajal szemceruzák
hy: Սուրմա մատիտներ
id: Pensil Kohl
is: Kólblýantar
it: Matite kajal
ja: コールペンシル
ka: სურმის ფანქრები
kk: Көмірлі қарындаштар
km: ខ្មៅដៃ Kohl
ko: 콜 펜슬
ky: Карандаши кохль
lt: Kohlio pieštukai
lv: Akmens ogļu zīmuļi
mk: Моливи за очи со кохл
ms: Pensel Kohl
mt: Lapsijiet Kohl
nl: Kohlpotloden
no: Kohl blyanter
pl: Ołówki do oczu Kohl
pt: Lápis de kohl
ro: Creioane kajal
ru: Карандаши для глаз с кохлем
sk: Kajalové ceruzky
sl: Svinčniki za oči s kohlom
sq: Lapsa Kohl
sr: Оловке за очи са кохлом
sv: Kohlpennor
sw: Penseli za Kohl
tg: Қаламҳои коҳл
tk: Köhli galamlar
tr: Sürme kalemleri
uk: Олівці для очей з кохлем
ur: کاجل پنسل
uz: Ko'mirli qalamlar
vi: Bút chì Kohl
zh: 煤精铅笔

en: Eyewash
da: Øjenskyl
fr: Solutions de lavage oculaire, Bains oculaires
sv: Ögonskölj

en: Eye drops
da: Øjendråber
fr: Collyres, Collyre, Gouttes pour les yeux
sv: Ögondroppar

en: Face Makeup
ar: مكياج الوجه
az: Üz makiyajı
bg: Грим за лице
cs: Make-up na obličej
da: Ansigtsmakeup
de: Gesichtsmakeup
el: Μακιγιάζ προσώπου
es: Maquillaje facial
et: Näomeik
fa: آرایش صورت
fi: Kasvomeikki
fr: Maquillage pour le teint
ga: Smideadh aghaidhe
hr: Šminka za lice
hu: Arcsmink
hy: Դեմքի դիմահարդարում
is: Andlitsförðun
it: Trucco per il viso
ja: フェイスメイク
ka: სახის მაკიაჟი
kk: Бет макияжы
ko: 페이스 메이크업
ky: Бет макияжы
lt: Veido makiažas
lv: Sejas grims
mk: Шминка за лице
ms: Solek muka
mt: Mejkapp tal-wiċċ
nl: Gezichtsmake-up
no: Ansiktsminke
pl: Makijaż twarzy
pt: Maquilhagem facial
ro: Machiaj pentru față
ru: Макияж лица
sk: Make-up na tvár
sl: Ličenje obraza
sq: Grim për fytyrë
sr: Шминка за лице
sv: Ansiktsmakeup
sw: Vipodozi vya uso
tg: Ороиши рӯй
tk: Ýüz makýažy
tr: Yüz makyajı
uk: Макіяж для обличчя
uz: Yuz makiyaji
vi: Trang điểm mặt
zh: 脸部彩妆

en: Foundations, Foundation
az: Tonal krem
bg: Фон дьо тен
da: Foundation
de: Foundation
es: Base de maquillaje
et: Jumestuskreem
fa: کرم پودر
fi: Meikkivoide
fr: Fonds de teint
ga: Fondúireacht
hr: Podloga
hu: Alapozó
hy: Տոնային քսուք
id: Alas bedak
is: Undirstaða
it: Fondotinta
ja: ファンデーション
ka: ტონალური კრემი
kk: Тоналды крем
ko: 파운데이션
ky: Тоналдык крем
lt: Makiažo pagrindas
lv: Tonālais krēms
mk: Пудра
ms: Krim asas
mt: Fondazzjoni
nl: Foundation
no: Foundation
pl: Podkład
pt: Base
ro: Fond de ten
ru: Тональный крем
sl: Podlaga
sq: Pudër
sr: Пудер
sv: Foundation
sw: Msingi
tg: Креми тоналӣ
th: รองพื้น
tk: Tonal krem
tr: Fondöten
uk: Тональний крем
uz: Tonal krem
vi: Kem nền
zh: 粉底

en: Powder foundations
fr: Fond de teint poudre

en: Liquid foundations
ar: كريم أساس سائل
az: Maye tonal krem
bg: Течен фон дьо тен
cs: Tekutý make-up
da: Flydende foundation
de: Flüssige Foundation
el: Υγρό make-up
es: Base de maquillaje líquida
et: Vedel jumestuskreem
fa: کرم پودر مایع
fi: Nestemäinen meikkivoide
fr: Fond de teint liquide
ga: Fondúireacht leachtach
hr: Tekući puder
hu: Folyékony alapozó
hy: Հեղուկ տոնային քսուք
id: Alas bedak cair
is: Fljótandi undirstaða
it: Fondotinta liquido
ja: リキッドファンデーション
ka: თხევადი ტონალური კრემი
kk: Сұйық тоналды крем
ko: 액체 파운데이션
ky: Суюк тоналдык крем
lt: Skystas makiažo pagrindas
lv: Šķidrais tonālais krēms
mk: Течна пудра
ms: Krim asas cecair
mt: Fondazzjoni likwida
nl: Vloeibare foundation
no: Flytende foundation
pl: Podkład w płynie
pt: Base líquida
ro: Fond de ten lichid
ru: Жидкий тональный крем
sk: Tekutý make-up
sl: Tekoča podlaga
sq: Pudër likuide
sr: Течни пудер
sv: Flytande foundation
sw: Msingi wa maji
tg: Креми тоналӣ моеъ
th: รองพื้นชนิดน้ำ
tk: Suwuk tonal krem
tr: Likit fondöten
uk: Рідкий тональний крем
uz: Suyuq tonal krem
vi: Kem nền dạng lỏng
zh: 粉底液

en: Bronzing powders, Bronzers
fr: Poudres bronzantes